District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.10

Location of business incubators.

The Mayor shall locate business incubators in areas in the District appropriate to the types of businesses targeted for occupancy, based on District-determined priorities, and shall seek sites which have the least prohibitive zoning in order to allow a range of uses.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 11, 32 DCR 6334
1981 Ed., § 1-2240.